Utah statutes.
23-25-11.   Construction and severability.

(1)  This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes stated herein.

(2)  The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if a phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of a participating state or of the United States, or the applicability thereof to a government, agency, individual, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact shall not be affected thereby.

(3)  If this compact is held contrary to the constitution of a participating state, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the participating state affected regarding all severable matters.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 1992 General Session

